Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 9 Mass Transportation

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 898, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The department will form a pilot program that will provide a state level flow through point for any available federal funding or other forms of financial and development sources and assistance for local, regional, and public-private streetcar projects. Any funding through bonds for such pilot and grant program shall be administered by the State Road and Tollway Authority.” Ga. L. 2006, p. 498, § 5/SB 150, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for the repeal of Ga. L. 2004, p. 898, § 2, effective April 27, 2006.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Grant programs, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, State Department of Transportation, Chapter 672-12.